Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5516.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-19-31 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-19 entitled "Conduct of
Election and Voting Equipment, and Supplies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-19-31. Irregular ballots.
Ballots voted for any person whose name does not appear on the ballot as a nominated
candidate for office are referred to in this section as “irregular ballots.” In voting for presidential
electors, a voter may vote an irregular ticket made up of the names of persons in nomination by
different parties; or partly of names of persons in nomination and partly of names of persons not in
nomination; or wholly of names of persons not in nomination by any party. Scanned images of the
computer ballot containing the irregular ballot shall be stored digitally on physical electronic media
in the optical-scan precinct-count unit and published on the state board website. With that
exception, no irregular ballot shall be voted for any person for any office whose name appears on
the ballot as a nominated candidate for that office; any irregular ballot so voted shall not be counted.
An irregular ballot must be cast in its appropriate place on the ballot, or it shall be void and not
counted and no irregular ballots shall be counted at primaries; provided, that at any presidential
primary, irregular ballots shall be counted for those persons whose names have been written in for
the office of president. At the close of the polls, irregular ballots shall be packaged according to §
17-19-33 and shall be immediately delivered to the local board of canvassers. The local board shall
receive the tape from the optical precinct-count unit containing printed images of each written name

on the irregular ballots, or the physical electronic media containing images of the irregular ballots
and record containing all write-in votes cast for all federal, state, and local races listed on the tape.
If the total number of write-in votes cast, may affect the election outcome for a particular office,
including whenever the total number of write-in ballots cast falls within the margins of a valid
recount request for that office, the local board shall adjudicate each individual write-in vote cast
for that office and report the total qualified write-in votes cast to the state board. The state board
shall notify the applicable local board(s) when the total write-in votes cast in any contest, may
affect the election outcome for any particular office. The local board shall notify the state board of
the results through a procedure promulgated by the state board. A write-in candidate, who has filed
required campaign finance reports with the state board, or who has neither accepted contributions,
nor made aggregate expenditures in excess of the amounts for which a filing exemption would be
available to other candidates under § 17-25-11(e), is entitled to an adjudication of the write-in votes
cast in their contest, regardless of the total write-in votes cast in that contest, through a procedure
promulgated by rules and regulations of the state board. The rules shall be promulgated in
accordance with the rulemaking provisions of chapter 35 of title 42 ("administrative procedures"),
notwithstanding the provisions of § 42-35-18(b)(7), except where urgently necessary to address a
time sensitive issue.
SECTION 2. Section 17-22-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-22 entitled "Tabulation
and Certification of Returns by State Board" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-22-7. Books of record of votes — Contents.
(a) The board shall keep separate books of record of the votes cast for the different classes
of officers which it is its duty to count, canvass, and tabulate, as follows:
(1) A book of record of votes cast for electors of president and vice-president;
(2) A book of record of votes cast for senators and representatives in congress;
(3) A book of record of votes cast for general officers; and
(4) A book of record of the votes cast for each class of officers that may by law
subsequently be required to be counted, canvassed, and tabulated by the board.
(b) Each of the respective books shall contain:
(1) A record of the number of votes cast in each voting district for each candidate according
to the counting, canvassing, and tabulating of the board;
(2) The number cast in each voting district for each candidate according to the certificates
of the moderators or wardens and clerks;
(3) The total number cast for each candidate in each town and city according to the counting
and to the certificates;
LC001144/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

(4) The total number cast for each candidate in the state or congressional district, as the
case may be, according to the counting and the certificates;
(5) A statement of which candidates are elected; and
(6) Any other pertinent facts that the board deems proper.
(c) The board shall also keep a book of record of the votes cast for and against any
proposition of amendment of the Constitution and a book of record of the votes cast for and against
all questions submitted to the electors of the state, with like detail as provided in this section in
relation to votes cast for officers.
(d) Notwithstanding the above, the state board shall report publish on its website images
of all write-in votes cast for each particular office, regardless of candidate eligibility and regardless
of whether it may affect the outcome, and shall report all write-in votes adjudicated by the local
board in accordance with § 17-19-31, received by persons, not otherwise qualifying to appear on
the ballot and receiving less than five (5) votes in a race, as a composite total of all write-in votes
cast for said office and shall also publish the overall total number of write-in votes cast for and with
each particular office.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001144/SUB A
========
LC001144/SUB A - Page 3 of 4